Washington statutes.
RCW 36.96.900

Chapter not exclusive.

The provisions of this chapter to dissolve inactive special purpose districts shall not be exclusive, and shall be in addition to any other method or methods provided by law to dissolve a special purpose district.

[ 1979 ex.s. c 5 s 10.]